North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127A. Militia.
Article 7. Regulations as to Active Service.

§ 127A-97.
National Guard and naval militia first ordered out.

In all cases the North Carolina National Guard and naval militia as provided for in this Chapter shall be first ordered into service.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 44; C.S., s. 6857; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina.”

§ 127A-98.
Regulations enforced on active State service.

Whenever any portion of the militia is called into active State service to execute the law, secure the safety of persons and property, suppress riots or insurrections, repel invasions or provide disaster relief, the provisions of the Uniform Code of Military Justice of the United States, governing the Armed Forces of the United States, and the regulations prescribed for the Armed Forces of the United States, and the regulations issued thereunder, shall be enforced and regarded as part of this Chapter until this portion of the militia is relieved from the duty. As to offenses committed when the provisions of the Uniform Code of Military Justice of the United States are so enforced, courts-martial shall possess, in addition to the jurisdiction and power of sentence and punishment herein vested in them, all additional jurisdiction and power of sentence and punishment exercisable by like courts under the provisions of the Uniform Code of Military Justice of the United States or regulations or laws governing the Armed Forces of the United States or the customs and usages thereof; but no punishment under the Code that extends to the taking of life shall in any case be inflicted except in case of war, invasion, or insurrection, declared by a proclamation of the Governor to exist and then only after approval by the Governor of the sentence inflicting that punishment. Imprisonment other than in guardhouse shall be executed in county jails or other prisons designated by the Governor for that purpose.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 45; C.S., s. 6858; 1963, c. 1018, s. 6; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, in the first sentence, twice substituted “Armed Forces” for “armed forces,” substituted “this portion of the militia is relieved from the duty” for “said forces shall be relieved from such duty,” and made a minor stylistic change, and in the second sentence, substituted “Armed Forces of the United States” for “United States armed forces” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 127A-99.
Regulations governing unorganized militia.

Whenever any part of the unorganized militia is ordered out, it shall be governed by the same rules and regulations and be subject to the same penalties as the North Carolina National Guard or naval militia.

History.

1917, c. 200, s. 35; C.S., s. 6859; 1975, c. 604, s. 2; 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-195, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-281, s. 1, effective July 10, 2009, substituted “National Guard” for “national guard” in this section.

Session Laws 2011-195, s. 1(a), effective June 23, 2011, inserted “North Carolina.”

§§ 127A-100 through 127A-104.

Reserved for future codification purposes.